Washington statutes.
RCW 4.14.040

Attached property—Custody.

Whenever any action is removed from a justice court to a superior court under the provisions of this chapter, any attachment or sequestration of the property of the defendant in such action in the justice court shall remain in the custody of the sheriff to answer the final judgment or decree in the same manner as would have been held to answer had the cause been brought in the superior court originally.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 46 s 7.]